Utah statutes.
76-10-512.   Target concessions, shooting ranges, competitions, and hunting excepted from prohibitions.

The provisions of Section 76-10-509 and Subsection 76-10-509.4(1) regarding possession of handguns by minors shall not apply to any of the following:

(1)  Patrons firing at lawfully operated target concessions at amusement parks, piers, and similar locations provided that the firearms to be used are firmly chained or affixed to the counters.

(2)  Any person in attendance at a hunter's safety course or a firearms safety course.

(3)  Any person engaging in practice or any other lawful use of a firearm at an established range or any other area where the discharge of a firearm is not prohibited by state or local law.

(4)  Any person engaging in an organized competition involving the use of a firearm, or participating in or practicing for such competition.

(5)  Any minor under 18 years of age who is on real property with the permission of the owner, licensee, or lessee of the property and who has the permission of a parent or legal guardian or the owner, licensee, or lessee to possess a firearm not otherwise in violation of law.

(6)  Any resident or nonresident hunters with a valid hunting license or other persons who are lawfully engaged in hunting.

(7)  Any person traveling to or from any activity described in Subsection (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6) with an unloaded firearm in his possession.



Amended by Chapter 303, 2000 General Session

